Mississippi, session 2026, HB1811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Chapter 903, Local and Private Laws of 2021, is amended as follows: Section 1.  (1)  The Board of Supervisors of Noxubee County, Mississippi, in its discretion, is authorized, by resolution duly adopted, to levy an assessment, in addition to any other assessments and court costs in the Justice Court of Noxubee County, as follows: (a)  An amount not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) on each conviction or nonadjudication under the Mississippi Implied Consent Law; and (b)  An amount not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) on each misdemeanor conviction or nonadjudication other than those specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection, and on each civil case filed. (2)  The avails of the additional assessment imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be placed in a special fund of Noxubee County designated the "Noxubee County Capital Improvements Fund" and shall be expended by the Board of Supervisors to fund capital improvements in the county. (3)  This section shall be repealed from and after July 1, * * *2026 2030. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.